Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.025

Disposition of retirement system proceeds payable to slayer or abuser.

Proceeds payable to a slayer or abuser as the beneficiary of any benefits flowing from one of the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030, by virtue of the decedent's membership in the department of retirement systems or by virtue of the death of decedent, shall be paid instead as designated in RCW 41.04.273.

[ 2009 c 525 s 3; 1998 c 292 s 502.]

NOTES:

Application—Conflict with federal requirements—1998 c 292: See notes following RCW 41.04.273.

Effective dates—1998 c 292: See RCW 11.11.903.